Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Special Designations of Portions of Highway System and Bridges
§ 65-3-71.39.
“Bishop Charles Harrison Mason Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 17 in Holmes County beginning at its intersection with I-55 and extending northerly to Lexington, Mississippi, shall be known and designated as the “Bishop Charles Harrison Mason Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs on and along that portion of Mississippi Highway 17 described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 317 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

§ 65-3-71.40.
“Wade Guice Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 15 in Harrison County beginning at Interstate Highway 110 and extending northerly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 26 is designated and shall be known as the “Wade Guice Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs on and along that portion of Mississippi Highway 15 described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 461, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1997).

§ 65-3-71.41.
“Veterans Memorial Drive” designated.

That portion of U. S. Highway 11 in the City of Hattiesburg beginning at its intersection with South 28th Avenue Extension and proceeding southwesterly to where U. S. Highway 11 intersects with Interstate Highway 59 is designated and shall be known as “Veterans Memorial Drive.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs on and along that portion of U. S. Highway 11 described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 461, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1997).

§ 65-3-71.42.
“Arthur Winstead Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 21 in Neshoba County from its intersection with Mississippi 15 and Mississippi 19 northeasterly to the Neshoba County line shall be known as the “Arthur Winstead Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that portion of Mississippi Highway 21 described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 461, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1997).

§ 65-3-71.43.
“William Jerome Huskey Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U. S. Highway 278 in Monroe County beginning at Amory and extending southeasterly to the Mississippi/Alabama state line is designated and shall be known as the “William Jerome Huskey Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs on and along that portion of U. S. Highway 278 described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 569, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1997).

§ 65-3-71.44.
“Major General William ‘Bud’ Miley Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 389 in the City of Starkville starting at Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., Drive north to the city limits of Starkville is hereby designated as the “Major General William ‘Bud’ Miley Highway.”

The State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs on the designated segment of such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 363, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1998).

§ 65-3-71.45.
“J.D. Batson Memorial Bridge” designated.

That bridge on Mississippi Highway 26 in Pearl River County that spans the Hobolochitto Creek is designated and shall be known as the “J.D. Batson Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate plaques at each end of the bridge, and suitable markers along and approaching the bridge, reflecting its name.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 405, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1998).

§ 65-3-71.46.
“Bobby McRary Memorial Drive” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 43 in Rankin County beginning at Mississippi Highway 25 and extending easterly to Mississippi Highway 481 shall be known as the “Bobby McRary Memorial Drive.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 598, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 65-3-71.47.
“Military Order of the Purple Heart, Department of Mississippi, Memorial Bridge” designated.

That bridge which is to be constructed over Interstate Highway 59 at Lincoln Road in the City of Hattiesburg and Lamar County shall be known and shall be designated as the “Military Order of the Purple Heart, Department of Mississippi, Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs approaching each end of the bridge described in subsection (1) of this section reflecting its name, and shall allow officers or official representatives of the Military Order of the Purple Heart, Department of Mississippi, to affix a memorial plaque at some suitable location on the bridge.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 491, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 30, 1999.).

§ 65-3-71.48.
“Veterans Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 61 located in Adams County beginning at the corporate limits of the City of Natchez and extending northerly to the community of Washington, a distance of approximately three and two-tenths (3.2) miles, is hereby designated as “Veterans Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway designated in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 491, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 30, 1999.).

§ 65-3-71.49.
“John McPherson Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 82 beginning at the Carroll County line and extending easterly to the City of Winona shall be known as the “John McPherson Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that portion of U.S. Highway 82 described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 531, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 1999.).

§ 65-3-71.50.
“Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., Boulevard” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 82 that bypasses the City of Winona shall be known as the “Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., Boulevard.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that portion of U.S. Highway 82 described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 531, § 6; Laws, 2000, ch. 338, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 65-3-71.51.
“George Harris, Sr., Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 82 beginning at the eastern city limits of the City of Winona and extending easterly to the Montgomery/Webster County line, except for the portion within the corporate limits of the Town of Kilmichael, shall be known as the “George Harris, Sr., Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that portion of U.S. Highway 82 described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 338, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 304, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-71.52.
Major General James W. Ball Memorial Highway.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 35 in Marion County, Mississippi, beginning at the Mississippi/Louisiana state line and extending to Foxworth shall be known and designated as the “Major General James W. Ball Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 374, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 65-3-71.53.
“Delvru John Anthony Minor Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 84 in Adams County from its intersection with U.S. Highway 61 in Washington, Mississippi, and extending in an easterly direction to the point at which State Park Road meets U.S. Highway 84 shall be known as the “Delvru John Anthony Minor Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 400, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 65-3-71.54.
“E.C. Gable Memorial Bridge” designated.

That bridge on Mississippi Highway 537 in Jones County that spans Reedy Creek that is located approximately two and one-tenths (2.1) miles north of Fifth Avenue in Laurel, is designated and shall be known as the “E.C. Gable Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate plaques at each end of the bridge, and suitable marker along and approaching the bridge, reflecting its name.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 404, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 17, 2000.).

§ 65-3-71.55.
“C.F. ‘Pappy’ Franklin Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 7 beginning at the corporate limits of the City of Coffeeville and extending southerly to the Yalabousha County line shall be known as the “C.F. ‘Pappy’ Franklin Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that portion of Mississippi Highway 7 described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 445, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 2000).

§ 65-3-71.56.
“Joe Clay-John Austin Hatcher Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 490 in Winston County beginning at the Noxapater city limits and extending easterly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 397 is designated and shall be known as the “Joe Clay-John Austin Hatcher Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs at the eastern city limits of the City of Noxapater and at the intersection of Mississippi Highway 490 and Mississippi Highway 397 indicating the name of the highway segment described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 572, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 65-3-71.57.
“31st Infantry Division Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Interstate 20 within the State of Mississippi shall be known as the “31st Infantry Division Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 572, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 606, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 65-3-71.58.
“Hershal L. Grady Memorial Highway”.

Mississippi 908, a route providing direct access from the interchange at I-55 at or near Summit to Southwest Community College, is designated and shall be known as the “Hershal L. Grady Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 574, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 2000.).

§ 65-3-71.59.
“Bruce Wayne Evans Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 613 in Jackson County beginning at its intersection with Big Point Road and extending northerly approximately 11.3 miles to the Jackson/George County line is designated and shall be known as the “Bruce Wayne Evans Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 366, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 65-3-71.60.
“Waverly Wray Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 35 in Panola County beginning with its intersection with Mississippi Highway 6 and extending southerly to the Tallahatchie County line shall be known as the “Waverly Wray Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that portion of Mississippi Highway 35 described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 430, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 65-3-71.61.
“Mortimer Barry Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 51 within the City of Winona known as South Applegate and that portion of U.S. Highway 51 south of the city limits of Winona extending from the city limits of the City of Winona for a distance of two (2) miles is designated and shall be known as the “Mortimer Barry Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 460, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 65-3-71.62.
“Jo Doss Miller Memorial Drive” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 8 in Monroe County, beginning at the intersection of Mississippi Highway 8 and U.S. Highway 45 and extending to the intersection of Mississippi Highway 8 and Oakland Drive, shall be known as “Jo Doss Miller Memorial Drive.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 493, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 24, 2001.).

§ 65-3-71.63.
“Military Order of the Purple Heart Drive” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 25 beginning at the Hinds/Rankin County line and extending northeasterly to U.S. Highway 82 in Oktibbeha County shall be known and designated as “Military Order of the Purple Heart Drive.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 606, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 348, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 26, 2008.).

§ 65-3-71.64.
“Sheriff E.C. Mullins Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of New U.S. Highway 49 in the City of Mendenhall, Simpson County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 13 and extending southerly to its intersection with Old U.S. Highway 49 (Jackson Avenue), is designated and shall be known as the “Sheriff E.C. Mullins Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 391, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 19, 2002.).

§ 65-3-71.65.
Portion of Mississippi 15 in Philadelphia designated as “Veterans’ Boulevard.”

That segment of the four-lane bypass for Mississippi Highway 15 within the City of Philadelphia, Mississippi, shall be known as “Veterans’ Boulevard.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 406, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 19, 2002.).

§ 65-3-71.66.
Portion of Mississippi 15/25 in Winston County designated as “Veterans’ Memorial Drive.”

That segment of Mississippi Highway 15/25 in Winston County is designated and shall be known as “Veterans’ Memorial Drive.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 417, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 19, 2002.).

§ 65-3-71.67.
“Corporal James D. Slaton Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 84 in Jones County beginning at the eastern city limits of the City of Laurel and extending easterly to the Jones/Wayne County line is designated and shall be known as the “Corporal James D. Slaton Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 421, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2002.).

§ 65-3-71.68.
“Hershel G. Jumper Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 4 in Prentiss County beginning at the western boundary of the City of Booneville and extending westerly to the Prentiss/Tippah county line, a distance of approximately six (6) miles, is designated and shall be known as the “Hershel G. Jumper Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 425, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-71.69.
Portion of U.S. 61 in Coahoma County designated as “Veterans’ Memorial Drive.”

That portion of U.S. Highway 61 in Coahoma County beginning at its intersection with State Road 161 North and extending southerly to its intersection with State Road 161 South is designated and shall be known as “Veterans’ Memorial Drive.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 458, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2002.).

§ 65-3-71.70.
Portion of Mississippi 19 in Lauderdale and Newton Counties designated as “Veterans Highway.”

That portion of Mississippi Highway 19 in Lauderdale and Newton Counties, beginning at the Alabama state line and extending northwesterly to the Neshoba county line, shall be known as “Veterans Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 556, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-71.71.
Portion of Mississippi 15 in Newton County designated as “WWII Veterans Highway.”

That portion of Mississippi Highway 15 in Newton County shall be known as “WWII Veterans Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 556, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-71.72.
“Jerry St. Pe’ Highway” designated.

Mississippi Highway 617 in Jackson County is designated and shall be known as the “Jerry St. Pe’ Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 556, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-71.73.
“Evelyn Gandy Parkway” designated.

That relocated segment of Mississippi Highway 42 in Forrest County beginning at its intersection with Interstate 59 and extending easterly to its intersection with Macedonia-Sunrise Road is designated and shall be known as the “Evelyn Gandy Parkway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

Each segment of the Regional Thoroughfare proposed by the Hattiesburg-Petal-Forrest-Lamar Planning Organization, as described by a map on file with the Office of Public Services of the City of Hattiesburg, shall, as completed, be designated and known as the “Evelyn Gandy Parkway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segments of highway described in subsection (1) of this section that are under its jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 556, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-71.74.
Portions of Mississippi 304 Spur in Tunica County designated “Martin Luther King, Jr., Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Highway 304 Spur in Tunica County is designated and shall be known as the “Martin Luther King, Jr., Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 628, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 25, 2002.).

§ 65-3-71.75.
“Eugene P. Wilkes Memorial Bridge” designated.

That bridge on Cowan-Lorraine Road in Harrison County that spans the Harrison County Industrial Seaway is designated and shall be known as the “Eugene P. Wilkes Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain an appropriate plaque at each end of the bridge, and suitable markers along and approaching the bridge, reflecting its name.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 628, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 25, 2002.).

§ 65-3-71.76.
Portion of Smithdale Road in City of McComb designated as “Veterans Boulevard.”

That portion of Smithdale Road (Mississippi 570) between Northwest Avenue and Enterprise Road in the corporate limits of the City of McComb is designated and shall be known as “Veterans Boulevard.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of roadway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 628, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 25, 2002.).

§ 65-3-71.77.
“Stennis Airport Parkway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi 603 in Hancock County beginning at Interstate 10 and extending northerly to Kiln is designated and shall be known as “Stennis Airport Parkway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section, including signs on Interstate 10 designating the proper exit from Interstate 10 to Stennis International Airport if such signs are permitted under applicable federal laws, rules and regulations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 628, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 25, 2002.).

§ 65-3-71.78.
Portion of Mississippi Highway 315 in Yalobusha and Lafayette Counties designated as “Dr. Dewitt Clinton French Memorial Highway.”

That portion of Mississippi Highway 315 beginning at the eastern boundary of the corporate limits of the City of Water Valley, Yalobusha County, and extending easterly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 9W in Lafayette County is designated and shall be known as the “Dr. Dewitt Clinton French Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 342, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 12, 2003.).

§ 65-3-71.79.
Portion of Mississippi Highway 1 in Sharkey and Issaquena Counties designated as “C.B. ‘Buddie’ Newman Memorial Highway.”

That portion of Mississippi Highway 1 in Sharkey and Issaquena Counties beginning at its intersection with U.S. Highway 61 at or near Onward and extending westerly and northerly to the Issaquena/Washington county line is designated and shall be known as the “C.B. ‘Buddie’ Newman Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 342, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 12, 2003.).

§ 65-3-71.80.
“Walton Greene Gray Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 25 in Monroe County beginning at its intersection with Highway 382 to its intersection with U.S. Highway 45 Alternate is designated and shall be known as the “Walton Greene Gray Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 382, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2003.).

§ 65-3-71.81.
Portion of Mississippi Highway 18 in Jasper County designated as “Sheriff Tom Royce Green Memorial Highway.”

That portion of Mississippi Highway 18 in Jasper County beginning at the corporate limits of the Town of Bay Springs and extending northeasterly approximately twenty (20) miles to the Rose Hill community shall be known as the “Sheriff Tom Royce Green Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that portion of Mississippi Highway 18 described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 500, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 31, 2003.).

§ 65-3-71.82.
“Stephen E. Ambrose Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Interstate Highway 10 in Hancock County beginning at the Mississippi/Louisiana state line and extending easterly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 43 is designated and shall be known as the “Stephen E. Ambrose Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that portion of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 550, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2003.).

§ 65-3-71.83.
Bridge on U.S. Highway 45 spanning Mississippi 19 in Meridian designated “Military Order of the Purple Heart, Department of Mississippi, Memorial Bridge.”

That the bridge on U.S. Highway 45 which spans Mississippi 19 in Meridian, Mississippi, shall be known and shall be designated as the “Military Order of the Purple Heart, Department of Mississippi, Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs approaching each end of the bridge described in subsection (1) of this section reflecting its name, and shall allow officers or official representatives of the Military Order of the Purple Heart, Department of Mississippi, to affix a memorial plaque at some suitable location on the bridge.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 308, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 65-3-71.84.
“‘Medgar Evers Memorial Interchange” designated.”

The Interstate 20 and Highway 15 interchange in Newton County is designated and shall be known as the “Medgar Evers Memorial Interchange.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along the interchange.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 319, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 65-3-71.85.
“D’Lo World War II Veterans Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 149 (Old Highway 49) within the corporate limits of the Town of D’Lo, Simpson County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “D’Lo World War II Veterans Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 541, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 13, 2004.).

§ 65-3-71.86.
“Liberty Parkway” designated.

The municipal bypass south of Lexington connecting Mississippi Highways 17 and 12 is designated and shall be known as “Liberty Parkway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching such bypass.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 541, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 13, 2004.).

§ 65-3-71.87.
“Alton A. (Dolph) Kellar Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 43 located in Hancock County beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 603 and extending northerly and westerly to the Hancock/Pearl River county line is designated and shall be known as the “Alton A. (Dolph) Kellar Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 592, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 27, 2004.).

§ 65-3-71.88.
“Lance Corporal Roy M. Wheat Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Interstate Highway 59 located in Forrest County and in Jones County from the Forrest/Jones County line northerly to its intersection with 16th Avenue within the City of Laurel is designated and shall be known as the “Lance Corporal Roy M. Wheat Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 592, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 544, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 374, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 65-3-71.89.
“Joe Mitch McElwain Memorial Highway” designated.

Mississippi Highway 773 located in Tippah County is designated and shall be known as the “Joe Mitch McElwain Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 592, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 27, 2004.).

§ 65-3-71.90.
“Korean War Veterans Memorial Highway” designated.

U.S. Highway 80 within the State of Mississippi is designated and shall be known as the “Korean War Veterans Memorial Highway” in honor and memory of and in gratitude, recognition and appreciation for sacrifices and contributions made by the veterans of the Korean War.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching U.S. Highway 80.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 303, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 22, 2005.).

§ 65-3-71.91.
“David Bonds Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 25 located in Tishomingo County is designated and shall be known as the “David Bonds Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 320, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2005.).

§ 65-3-71.92.
“J.P. Woods Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 309 in Marshall County beginning at the community of Watson and extending northerly to the Mississippi/Tennessee state line, is designated and shall be known as the “J.P. Woods Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 348, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2005.).

§ 65-3-71.93.
“Veterans Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 84 located in Jones County beginning from 16th Avenue within the corporate limits of Laurel and extending westerly to the Jones/Covington county line is designated and shall be known as the “Veterans Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 418, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 65-3-71.94.
“Deputy Len J. Rowell Memorial Highway” designated.”

The southbound lane of Interstate 59 in Pearl River County near mile-marker 35 is designated and shall be known as the “Deputy Len J. Rowell Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of the highway described in subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 418, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 379, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 18, 2015).

§ 65-3-71.95.
“Chaney, Goodman and Schwerner Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 19 located in Neshoba County beginning at the corporate limits of Philadelphia in Neshoba County and extending southeasterly to the Neshoba/Newton county line is designated and shall be known as the “Chaney, Goodman and Schwerner Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 418, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 65-3-71.96.
“Emmitt Till Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 49E located in Leflore and Tallahatchie Counties beginning at the intersection of U.S. Highway 49E and U.S. Highway 82 and extending to the intersection of U.S. Highway 49E and Mississippi Highway 3 is designated and shall be known as the “Emmitt Till Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 418, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 65-3-71.97.
“Joe A. Waggoner Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 43 located in Leake, Madison and Rankin Counties beginning at the western corporate limits of the town of Sandhill, in Rankin County, and extending northerly to the Leake/Attala County line, is designated and shall be known as the “Joe A. Waggoner Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate markers along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 490, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2005.).

§ 65-3-71.98.
“Heroes Trail” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 472 in Copiah County beginning at Shady Grove Church and extending easterly to Rock Port Road is designated and shall be known as “Heroes Trail.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 524, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2005.).

§ 65-3-71.99.
“Officer Ronald Wayne Jones Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of U.S. Highway 84 located in Jefferson Davis County is designated and shall be known as the “Officer Ronald Wayne Jones Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 524, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2005.).

§ 65-3-71.100.
“Amie Ewing Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 6 within the corporate limits of Oxford, Lafayette County, between the Old Taylor Road Exit and the South Lamar Exit is designated and shall be known as “Amie Ewing Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 524, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2005.).

§ 65-3-71.101.
“S.A. (Junior) Hancock Memorial Interchange” designated.

The interchange located at the intersection of Mississippi Highway 6 and the Natchez Trace Parkway in Lee County is designated and shall be known as the “S.A. (Junior) Hancock Memorial Interchange.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs approaching the interchange from the east and west that shall include the following: “S.A. (Junior) Hancock devoted his life to the completion of the Natchez Trace Parkway. His goal was achieved on May 21, 2005.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 310, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 65-3-71.102.
“Albert B. Shows Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 29 in Jones County, beginning at the Jones/Perry County line and extending to the southern city limits of Ellisville is designated and shall be known as the “Albert B. Shows Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation is directed to relocate the signage placed by the cemetery at the southern city limits of Ellisville on Mississippi Highway 29 to approximately one hundred (100) yards south of Augusta Road on the Interstate 59 and Mississippi Highway 590 bypass.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 310, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 314, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 7, 2013).

§ 65-3-71.103.
“Joe Pope Boulevard” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 1 within the corporate limits of the City of Rosedale, Bolivar County, is designated and shall be known as “Joe Pope Boulevard.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 493, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 65-3-71.104.
“J.O. Southward, Jr., Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 30 lying in Tishomingo County beginning at the Prentiss/Tishomingo county line and extending to the entrance road of the Natchez Trace Parkway shall be designated and known as the “J.O. Southward, Jr., Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 308, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 65-3-71.105.
“Birdia Keglar Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 35 in Tallahatchie County beginning at the northern corporate boundaries of the City of Charleston and extending northerly to the Tallahatchie/Panola county line is designated and shall be known as the “Birdia Keglar Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 387, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 15, 2007.).

§ 65-3-71.106.
“Veterans Drive” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 145 within the City of Aberdeen, beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 8 and extending northwesterly to U.S. Highway 45, is designated and shall be known as “Veterans Drive.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 408, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 16, 2007.).

§ 65-3-71.107.
“Randy Chancellor Memorial Highway” designated.

Mississippi Highway 537 located in Jones County is designated and shall be known as the “Randy Chancellor Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 411, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 16, 2007.).